California statutes. Corporations Code
14302.

Whenever the owner of real property to which water stock by the terms of the certificate thereof is appurtenant at the time of conveyance, by properly executed conveyance, transfers to another the real property with the appurtenances belonging to the property, or whenever title to the property passes by execution sale, or by foreclosure or probate proceedings, the secretary of the water company that issued the stock shall, upon exhibition to him or her of a deed of the land duly recorded, or the necessary court order duly recorded, issue to the grantee named in the conveyance a new certificate of stock for the number of shares appurtenant to the land as shown by the books and records of the company. The secretary of the water company shall enter the name of the grantee upon the books of the company as the owner of the shares of stock and shall cancel on the books the number of former shares of stock so appurtenant to the land in the name of the grantor or of any previous owner of the land, or of any other person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 598, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14303.

A corporation organized for or engaged in the business of selling, distributing, supplying, or delivering water for irrigation purposes or domestic use, and not as a public utility, may levy assessments upon its shares, whether or not fully paid, unless otherwise provided in its articles or bylaws. If any shares of the corporation that have been made appurtenant to any land as provided in this chapter, become delinquent in the payment of assessments, the right to receive water or dividends thereon may be denied, and they may be sold and transferred without those lands as if not appurtenant thereto, and the purchaser shall acquire the right to receive water as provided in the articles or bylaws of the corporation, or they may be forfeited to the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 598, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14304.

If a shareholder of a mutual water company has not timely paid any rate, charge, or assessment arising from, or related to, water service provided by the mutual water company to the shareholder’s property, and if authorized by its articles or bylaws, then after providing at least 20 days’ written notice to the shareholder, the board of directors of the mutual water company may authorize the recording of a notice of lien against that shareholder’s property to secure the collection of the rates, charges, and assessments owed to the mutual water company by the shareholder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 633, Sec. 1.   (AB 240)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14305.

(a) (1) This section shall be known and may be cited as the Mutual Water Company Open Meeting Act.

(2) This section shall only apply to a mutual water company that operates a public water system.

(b) (1) (A) A board of directors of a mutual water company shall allow an eligible person to personally attend a meeting of the board, if the eligible person gave the board at least 24 hours advance written notice of his or her intent to personally attend the meeting.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, the board of directors may use teleconferencing to provide any eligible person access to the meeting that otherwise would be denied attendance at a meeting of the board for failure to provide this notice, or because the number of eligible persons having already provided notice of attendance exceeds the room capacity of the place of the meeting described in the notice issued pursuant to subdivision (f). The teleconferenced meeting or proceeding shall comply with this section and all other applicable provisions of law relating to a specific type of meeting or proceeding conducted by a mutual water company. If the board uses teleconferencing, the board shall provide to an eligible person attending a meeting by teleconference,
 before the meeting begins, an electronic copy or photocopy of all documents not related to an executive session to be discussed at the meeting. A board of directors of a mutual water company shall not prohibit an eligible person from attending a meeting of the board either in person, so long as the eligible person has complied with the notice requirement of paragraph (A), or by teleconference except as provided by paragraph (2). A board of directors may allow an eligible person to attend the meeting personally in lieu of using teleconferencing pursuant to this paragraph.

(C) For purposes of this subdivision, the term “teleconference” means, to the extent it is technologically feasible, any electronic means, that includes either audio or video or both, that allows an eligible person to hear a meeting and verbally interact with the board, including, but not limited to, a telephone, cellular telephone with speaker phone technology, or computer, or a device using internet-based video or audio conference technology.

(2) A board of directors of a mutual water company shall only meet in executive session during a meeting. A board may prohibit an eligible person from attending an executive session to consider pending or potential litigation, matters relating to the formation
 of contracts with third parties, including matters relating to the potential acquisition of real property or water rights, member or shareholder discipline, personnel matters, or to meet with a member or shareholder, upon the member or shareholder’s request, regarding the member or shareholder’s payment of assessments, as specified in Section 14303.

 (3) The board of directors of a mutual water company shall meet in executive session, if requested by a member or shareholder who may be subject to a fine, penalty, or other form of discipline, and the member shall be entitled to attend the executive session.

(4) An eligible person shall be entitled to attend a teleconference meeting, as specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (o), or the portion of the teleconference meeting that is open to eligible persons, and shall be entitled to attend with or without fulfilling the notice requirement in paragraph (1). The teleconference meeting or portion of the meeting that is open to eligible persons shall be audible to the eligible person in a location specified in the notice of the meeting.

(c) Any
 matter discussed in executive session shall be generally noted in the minutes of the meeting at which the executive session occurred.

(d) The minutes, minutes proposed for adoption that are marked to indicate draft status, or a summary of the minutes, of any meeting of the board of directors of a mutual water company, conducted on or after January 1, 2014, other than an executive session, shall be available to eligible persons within 30 days of the meeting. The minutes, proposed minutes, or summary minutes shall be provided to any eligible person upon request and upon reimbursement of the mutual water company’s costs for providing the minutes.

(e) The pro forma budget required in Section 14306 shall be available to eligible persons within 30 days of the meeting at which the
 budget was adopted. The budget shall be provided to any eligible person upon request and upon reimbursement of the mutual water company’s costs.

(f) Unless the bylaws provide for a longer period of notice, eligible persons shall be given notice of the time and place of a meeting as defined in subdivision (o), except for an emergency meeting, at least four days prior to the meeting. Notice shall be given by posting the notice in a prominent, publicly accessible place or places within the territory served by the mutual water company and by mail to any eligible person who had requested notification of board meetings by mail, at the address requested by the eligible person. Eligible persons requesting notice by mail shall pay the costs of reproduction and mailing of the notice in advance. Notice may also be given by mail, by delivery of the notice
 to each unit served by the mutual water company, or, with the consent of the eligible person, by electronic means. The notice shall contain the agenda for the meeting.

(g) An emergency meeting of the board may be called by the chief executive officer of the mutual water company, or by any two members of the board of directors other than the chief executive officer, if there are circumstances that could not have been reasonably foreseen which require immediate attention and possible action by the board, and which of necessity make it impracticable to provide notice as required by this section.

(h) The board of directors of a mutual water company shall permit any eligible person to speak at any meeting of the mutual water company or the board of directors, except for any portion of
 a meeting that is held in executive session outside the presence of eligible persons. A reasonable time limit for all eligible persons to speak to the board of directors or before a meeting of the mutual water company shall be established by the board of directors.

(i) (1) Except as described in paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, the board of directors of the mutual water company shall not discuss or take action on any item at a nonemergency meeting unless the item was placed on the agenda included in the notice that was posted and distributed pursuant to subdivision (f). This subdivision does not prohibit an eligible person who is not a member of the board from speaking on issues not on the agenda.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a member of the board of directors,
 mutual water company officers, or a member of the staff of the mutual water company, may do any of the following:

(A) Briefly respond to statements made or questions posed by a person speaking at a meeting as described in subdivision (h).

(B) Ask a question for clarification, make an announcement, or make a brief report on his or her own activities, whether in response to questions posed by an eligible person or based upon his or her own initiative.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the board of directors or a member of the board of directors, subject to rules or procedures of the board of directors, may do any of the following:

(A) Provide a reference to, or
 provide other resources for factual information to, the mutual water company’s officers or staff.

(B) Request the mutual water company’s officers or staff to report back to the board of directors at a subsequent meeting concerning any matter, or take action to direct the mutual water company’s officers or staff to place a matter of business on a future agenda.

(C) Direct the mutual water company’s officers or staff to perform administrative tasks that are necessary to carry out this subdivision.

(4) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the board of directors may take action on any item of business not appearing on the agenda posted and distributed pursuant to subdivision (f) under any of the
 following conditions:

(i) Upon a determination made by a majority of the board of directors present at the meeting that an emergency situation exists. An emergency situation exists if there are circumstances that could not have been reasonably foreseen by the board, that require immediate attention and possible action by the board, and that, of necessity, make it impracticable to provide notice.

(ii) Upon a determination made by the board by a vote of two-thirds of the members present at the meeting, or, if less than two-thirds of total membership of the board is present at the meeting, by a unanimous vote of the members present, that there is a need to take immediate action and that the need for action came to the attention of the board after the agenda was posted and distributed
 pursuant to subdivision (f).

(iii) The item appeared on an agenda that was posted and distributed pursuant to subdivision (f) for a prior meeting of the board of directors that occurred not more than 30 calendar days before the date that action is taken on the item and, at the prior meeting, action on the item was continued to the meeting at which the action is taken.

(B) Before discussing any item pursuant to this paragraph, the board of directors shall openly identify the item to the members in attendance at the meeting.

(j) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the board of directors shall not take action on any item of business outside of a meeting.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board of directors shall not conduct a meeting via a series of electronic transmissions, including, but not limited to, electronic mail, except as specified in subparagraph (B).

(B) Electronic transmissions may be used as a method of conducting an emergency meeting if all members of the board, individually or collectively, consent in writing to that action, and if the written consent or consents are filed with the minutes of the meeting of the board. These written consents may be transmitted electronically.

(k) (1) An eligible person may bring a civil action for declaratory or equitable relief for a violation of this section by a mutual water company for which he or she is
 defined as an eligible person for a judicial determination that an action taken by the board is null and void under this section.

(2) Prior to the commencement of an action pursuant to paragraph (1), the eligible person shall make a demand on the board to cure or correct the action alleged to be taken in violation of this section. The demand shall be in writing, and submitted within 90 days from the date the action was taken. The demand shall state the challenged action of the board and the nature of the alleged violation.

(3) Within 30 days of receipt of the demand, the board shall cure or correct the challenged action and inform the demanding party in writing of its actions to cure or correct, or inform the demanding party in writing of its decision not to cure or correct the
 challenged action.

(4) Within 15 days of receipt of the written notice of the board’s decision to cure or correct or not to cure or correct, or within 15 days of the expiration of the 30-day period to cure or correct, whichever is earlier, the demanding party shall commence the action pursuant to paragraph (1). If the demanding party fails to commence the action pursuant to paragraph (1), that party shall be barred from commencing the action thereafter.

(l) A board action that is alleged to have been taken in violation of this section shall not be determined to be void if the action taken was in substantial compliance with this section.

(m) The fact that the board of directors of a mutual water company takes subsequent
 action to cure or correct an action taken pursuant to this section shall not be construed as, or admissible as evidence of, a violation of this section.

(n) An eligible person who prevails in a civil action to enforce his or her rights pursuant to this section shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs. A prevailing mutual water company shall not recover any costs, unless the court finds the action to be frivolous, unreasonable, or without foundation.

(o) As used in this section:

(1) “Eligible person” means a person who is any of the following:

(A) A shareholder or member of the mutual water company.

(B) A person who is an occupant, pursuant to a lease or a rental agreement, of commercial space or a dwelling unit to which the mutual water company sells, distributes, supplies, or delivers drinking water.

(C) An elected official of a city or county who represents people who receive drinking water directly from the mutual water company on a retail basis.

(D) Any other person eligible to participate in the mutual water company’s meetings under provisions of the company’s articles or bylaws.

(2) “Item of business” means any action within the authority of the board, except those actions that the board has validly delegated to any other person or persons, officer of the mutual water company, or
 committee of the board comprising less than a majority of the directors.

(3) “Meeting” means either of the following:

(A) A congregation of a majority of the members of the board at the same time and place to hear, discuss, or deliberate upon any item of business that is within the authority of the board.

(B) A teleconference in which a majority of the members of the board, in different locations, are connected by electronic means, through audio or video or both. A teleconference meeting shall be conducted in a manner that protects the rights of members of the mutual water company and otherwise complies with the requirements of this title. The notice of the teleconference meeting shall identify at least one physical location so
 that members of the mutual water company may attend and at least one member of the board of directors or a person designated by the board shall be present at that location. Participation by board members in a teleconference meeting constitutes presence at that meeting as long as all board members participating in the meeting are able to hear one another and members of the mutual water company speaking on matters before the board.

(4) “Mutual water company” means a mutual water company, as defined in Section 14300, that operates a public water system, as defined in Section 14300.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 669, Sec. 2.   (AB 1077)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14306.

(a) The board of a mutual water company that operates a public water system shall adopt, in an open meeting, an annual budget on or before the start of each fiscal year of the mutual water company.

(b) The board of a mutual water company that operates a public water system shall contract with a certified public accountant or public accountant to conduct an annual review of the financial records and reports of the mutual water company. The review shall be subject to generally accepted accounting standards.

(c) Eligible persons may request a copy of the report, and shall reimburse the mutual water company for the costs of providing the
 report.

(d) For purposes of this section, the term “eligible persons” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivision (o) of Section 14305.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 633, Sec. 3.   (AB 240)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14307.

(a) (1) Unless its governing documents impose more stringent standards, a mutual water company that operates a public water system shall make the following records promptly available upon written request to an eligible person upon payment of fees covering direct costs of duplication:

(A) Agendas and minutes of board meetings conducted on or after January 1, 2014.

(B) A copy of an annual budget adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14306.

(C) A copy of an accounting report prepared pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 14306.

(D) A copy of any records reporting the results of a water quality test.

(E) A copy of an annual report that has been distributed to the mutual water company’s shareholder or members.

(2) Any request for records pursuant to this subdivision shall be limited to the three calendar years preceding the written request for the records.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “eligible person” means a person who is any of the following:

(1) A stockholder or member of the mutual water company.

(2) A person who is an occupant, pursuant to a lease or a rental agreement, of commercial space or a dwelling unit to which the mutual water
 company sells, distributes, supplies, or delivers drinking water.

(3) An elected official of a city or county who represents people who receive drinking water directly from the mutual water company on a retail basis.

(4) Any other person eligible to obtain copies of the records listed in subdivision (a) under provisions of the mutual water company’s articles or bylaws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 633, Sec. 4.   (AB 240)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Mutual Water Companies Formed in Connection With Subdivided Lands [14310. - 14318.]

14310.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure both of the following:

(1) That when a mutual water company is formed or is about to be formed in connection with a subdivision, as defined in Sections 11000 and 11004.5 of the Business and Professions Code, an adequate potable water supply and distribution system exists for domestic use and fire protection.

(2) That adequate disclosure and protection to the security
 holders exist with respect to rights and duties arising from their security holdings in a mutual water company.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, the use of the term “subdivision” has the same definition as “subdivision” as defined in Sections 11000 and 11004.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 598, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14311.

A mutual water company formed on or after January 1, 1998, in connection with the offering for sale or lease, or with the sale or lease, of lots within a subdivision and organized to sell, distribute, supply, or deliver water for domestic use to owners of lots in the subdivision shall meet all the requirements of this chapter. A mutual water company described in this section and formed before January 1, 1998, may elect to meet all the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 598, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14312.

(a) Any person who intends to offer for sale or lease lots within a subdivision within this state and to provide water for domestic use to purchasers of the lots within a subdivision through the formation of a mutual water corporation described in Section 14311, shall include as part of the application for a public report, as described in Section 11010 of the Business and Professions Code, a separate document containing all of the following information, representations, and assurances:

(1) That the provisions of this chapter have been complied with.

(2) That the area in which the mutual water company proposes to deliver water encompasses and includes the entire
 subdivision and, when applicable, will include parcels to be annexed to the subdivision.

(3) That the mutual water company has contacted the Public Utilities Commission and the county local agency formation commission to determine if the proposed area described in paragraph (2) will overlap an existing water service area or if an existing water service area could more appropriately serve the subdivision.

(4) That the mutual water company has a source of, and title to, a water supply, distribution, and fire protection system sufficient to satisfy expected demands for water from the subdivision.

(5) That copies of the contracts and other documents relating to the acquisition by the mutual water company of the water supply, distribution, and fire protection system have been delivered to, and are on file with, the mutual
 water company and that these contracts and documents evidence the mutual water company’s title to the water supply, distribution, and fire protection system.

(6) That the subdivider or applicant has executed and entered into a written contract with the mutual water company wherein the subdivider or applicant has agreed to pay monthly a proportional part of the repair and replacement fund according to a ratio of the number of lots owned or controlled by the subdivider or applicant to the total number of lots in the subdivision.

(7) That an engineer’s report has been prepared in accordance with this chapter and Sections 260.504.2 to 260.504.2.4, inclusive, of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations and is on file with the mutual water company.

(8) That the mutual water company will distribute potable water for
 domestic use and has obtained, and has on file, a copy of the permit issued by the State Water Resources Control Board, as required pursuant to Section 116540 of the Health and Safety Code, or by a local primacy agency that has been delegated the authority to issue permits to small water systems, with the concurrence of the State Water Resources Control Board.

(9) That the securities of the mutual benefit water corporation will be sold or issued only to purchasers of lots in the subdivision, or to successors in interest of purchasers of lots in the subdivision, and not sold or issued to the subdivider, applicant, or to the successor in interest of the subdivider or applicant, and that the securities will be sold or issued only after a public report for the subdivision has been issued by the Real Estate Commissioner.

(10) That the securities to be issued by the mutual water company
 are appurtenant to the land pursuant to Section 14300.

(11) That the water supply and distribution system will serve each lot in the subdivision and be completed prior to the issuance of the public report by the Real Estate Commissioner.

(12) That there is a statement, signed by either the engineer who prepared the engineer’s report referred to in paragraph (7) or a person employed or acting on behalf of a public agency or other independent qualified person, that the water supply and distribution system has been examined and tested and that the water supply and distribution system operates in accordance with the design standards of the water supply and distribution system required by this chapter, and that a copy of this statement is on file with the mutual water company.

(13) That the articles of incorporation or
 bylaws of the mutual water company contain all of the following:

(A) A statement to the effect that the mutual water company shall provide water to all members or shareholders. If there will be an owners’ association of the subdivision, an additional statement that water shall also be provided to the common areas.

(B) A provision directing the board of directors to establish a rate structure that will result in the accumulation and maintenance of a fund for the repair, administration, maintenance, and replacement of the water supply, distribution, and fire protection system, that the rate charged shall bear a reasonable relationship to the cost of furnishing water and maintaining the system, and that unimproved lots included within the area to be served shall bear a proportionate share of the cost of repair and replacement of the water supply, distribution, and fire protection
 system, as well as a proportionate share of the cost of maintaining the fund.

(C) A statement evidencing a reasonable relationship between each unit of the securities to be issued and each unit of the area to be served, such as one share of common stock issued for each subdivision lot purchased.

(D) A prohibition on the issuance of fractional shares or securities.

(E) A statement, meeting the requirements of Section 14300, that the securities are appurtenant to the land within the area to be served.

(F) Provision for the transfer of the securities, voting rights of the security holders, inspection of books and records by security holders, necessary or contemplated expansion of the facilities of the mutual water company, and further subdivision, where
 applicable, of the area to be served.

(G) The limitation on the salaries paid to the persons operating, or employed by, the mutual water company, including officers and directors.

(H) A provision for annual meetings of the security holders accompanied by a provision for adequate notice.

(I) A provision for the annual distribution to each security holder of fiscal yearend financial statements within 105 days of the close of the fiscal year.

(J) In the case of a mutual water company that purchases water for distribution from a public utility, municipal water company, or water district, a provision for charging all security holders a pro rata amount of the cost of water supplied to an entity providing fire protection service.

(K) A provision that a share certificate shall be issued to each lot purchased.

(L) In the case of a mutual water company serving a residential subdivision, the following statements: (i) the mutual water company shall be a separate corporation formed and organized for the purpose described in Section 14311; and (ii) if a shareholder becomes delinquent in paying assessments, the right to receive water or dividends may be denied or forfeited but those rights shall not be sold or transferred without the land.

(14) That an offering circular has been prepared and will be used in any offer and sale of the securities of the mutual water company.

(15) That the writings and documents evidencing compliance with all of the above provisions of the subdivision are on
 file as part of the permanent record of the mutual water company.

(b) The contracts and documents described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) shall include all of the following:

(1) Any bill of sale transferring all personal property used and usable in the operation of the mutual water company.

(2) A copy of any recorded deed to the wells and water tanks to be used by the mutual water company in the supply, distribution, and fire protection system.

(3) Copies of any recorded deeds granting easements for construction, repair, maintenance, and improvements of the water supply, distribution, and fire protection system.

(c) The written contract described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a)
 shall provide that, in consideration of the transfer by the subdivider or applicant to the mutual water company of the water supply, distribution, and fire protection system, the mutual water company agrees to do all of the following:

(1) Sell and issue securities to the purchasers of the remaining lots in the subdivision on the same terms, except for the price if the difference is justified, as for the initial purchasers.

(2) Cooperate with the subdivider or applicant in the operation, maintenance, and improvement of the present and contemplated water supply, distribution, and fire protection system.

(3) Contract with the subdivider, applicant, or a successor in interest, if a reasonable request is made to do so, for the management of the mutual water company for as long as lots in the subdivision remain unsold. The
 terms of the contract shall be subject to approval by the board of directors of the mutual water company, including terms related to the compensation to the subdivider, applicant, or successor in interest, if any.

(d) The offering circular described in paragraph (14) of subdivision (a) shall be delivered to each prospective purchaser of the securities and shall include, among other things, all of the following:

(1) A discussion of the water supply, distribution, and fire protection system.

(2) A summary of the opinion of the engineer along with the engineer’s consent, as required by Sections 260.504.2 to 260.504.2.4, inclusive, of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) The area in which the mutual water company intends to provide water
 service.

(4) A discussion of the rights and duties of the security holders of the mutual water company as set forth in its articles of incorporation and bylaws, including the consequence of failure to pay for water or assessments.

(5) The fact that the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide that the shares or securities of the mutual water company may not be sold separately from the right to water evidenced by the security of the mutual water company and prohibit issuance of fractional shares or securities of the mutual water company.

(6) A discussion of the certificate issued by the State Water Resources Control Board certifying that the water is fit for domestic use.

(7) The limitation imposed on salaries to be paid to personnel operating, or
 employed by, the mutual water company, including officers and directors.

(8) A discussion of the transferability of the securities, the voting rights of the security holders, access to books and records, necessary or contemplated expansion of the facilities of the mutual water company, and further subdivision of the area to be served, if applicable.

(9) A discussion of the subdivider’s duties with respect to maintenance and repair or replacement of the water supply, distribution, or fire protection system; and a discussion of the establishment and maintenance of the operating, repair, and replacement fund.

(e) The following exhibits shall also be attached to the offering circular:

(1) A copy of the articles of incorporation and bylaws of the mutual
 water company, including the articles of incorporation or bylaws recorded under Section 14300.

(2) A copy of financial statements of the mutual water company. If the mutual water company has not yet commenced operations, a detailed operating budget for the first six months of operations should be included as an exhibit to the offering circular. The operating budget must include estimated monthly fees to be charged to the water users.

(3) A specimen certificate evidencing the security to be issued and meeting the requirements of Section 14300.

(f) The Real Estate Commissioner shall prescribe the form and content of the document required by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 143, Sec. 37.   (SB 251)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14313.

The engineer’s report prepared pursuant to the document under Section 14312 shall contain all relevant information pertaining to the proposed water supply, distribution, and fire protection system, including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) A system map of the area to be served showing all of the following:

(1) The total acreage.

(2) The number and location of lots
 into which the area is or can be subdivided and the location of the connection for water service.

(3) The location of all sources of supply, principal pumping stations, diversion works, water treatment and filter plants, and storage facilities.

(4) The size, character, and location of all mains and ditches.

(5) The location of all valves and gates, gauges, interconnections with other systems, and fire hydrants.

(6) The location, size, and kind of each service pipe.

(7) The layout of all principal pumping stations and water treatment and filter plants to show size, location, and character of all major equipment, pipelines, connections, valves, and other equipment used in connection
 therewith.

(8) The date of construction and condition of all principal items of plant and extensions of all mains.

(b) A description of the sources of supply, including, in the case of wells, information on the depth, diameter, and casing of the well, and a statement indicating that the proposed water supply and distribution system complies with this section, supported by reports showing the sustained capacity of source of supply, or, if all or some water is to be obtained from another source, copies of contracts for obtaining such water, together with estimates of the present and ultimate water consumption in the area to be served.

(c) A statement indicating in detail the cost of the water supply, distribution, and fire protection system, and indicating the cost of any required repairs or replacement.

(d) An opinion by the engineer to the effect that the water supply, distribution, and fire protection system will adequately, dependably, and safely meet the total requirements for all water consumers under maximum consumption and will meet the requirements of Section 14314. The opinion shall have attached to it the calculations and data used in estimating the water requirements.

(e) A statement by the engineer of the estimated cost of maintenance of the system, the estimated useful life of the components of the system, the estimated cost of replacement of the system, and the monthly or annual amount which should be charged to establish a reasonable reserve for maintenance and replacement of the system based on these estimates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 598, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14314.

The water supply and distribution system of a mutual water company described in Section 14311 that proposes to distribute water for domestic use pursuant to this chapter shall comply with all of the following design standards:

(a) The system shall be adequate to maintain normal operating pressure of not less than 25 pounds per square inch, nor more than 125 pounds per square inch, at the service connection; provided, however, that during periods of hourly maximum demand, or at the time of peak seasonal
 loads, the pressure may be reduced to not less than 20 pounds per square inch, and during periods of hourly minimum demand the pressure may increase to not more than 150 pounds per square inch. Variations in pressure under normal operation shall not exceed 50 percent of the average operating pressure. The average operating pressure shall be determined by computing the arithmetical average of at least 24 consecutive hourly pressure readings.

(b) The quantity of water delivered to the distribution system from all source facilities shall be sufficient to supply adequately, dependably, and safely the total requirements of all water consumers under maximum consumption, and shall be sufficient to maintain the pressure specified by subdivision (a).

(c) The distribution system shall provide at least one connection per service and, to the extent feasible, shall be designed in a property
 segmented grid so as to do both of the following:

(1) Minimize the extent of interruption in water service when repairs are necessary.

(2) Avoid dead ends in its water mains.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 598, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14315.

(a) The mutual water company described in Section 14311 shall provide at least a minimum level of water service to its customers for fire protection purposes as an inherent part of the water system design in accordance with the standards set forth in this section. The standards set forth in this section are the minimum levels of water service that the mutual water company shall provide and shall not preclude the mutual water company from designing a fire protection system that meets higher standards, nor preclude any governmental agency from
 setting higher standards in any area subject to its jurisdiction. A mutual water company may request a fire protection agency to approve a fire protection system that does not meet the standards set forth in this chapter upon a showing by the mutual water company that the proposed system is adequate for fire protection purposes.
